Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.120

Execution barred upon decedent's death—Presentation—Sale of property.

If a judgment was entered against the decedent during the decedent's lifetime, an execution may not issue on the judgment after the death of the decedent. If a notice agent is acting, the judgment must be presented in the manner provided in RCW 11.42.070, but if the judgment is a lien on any property of the decedent, the property may be sold for the satisfaction of the judgment and the officer making the sale shall account to the notice agent for any surplus.

[ 1997 c 252 s 36; 1994 c 221 s 42.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.